src-fst-morphology-affixes-prefixes.lexc.md
Prefixes
Prefixes in the Paumarí language are attatched to the left of other words, such as person markers

hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: kodi-hado # "my knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: kada-hado # "your knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3M: kidi-hado # "his knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3F: ka-hado # "her knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ʼakdi-hado # "our knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ʼavakadi-hado # "your knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3M: vakadi-hado #  "their knife"
hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3F: vakadi-hado # "their knife"

noki+V+Prs+ScSg1: o-noki-vini  #  "I see"
noki+V+Prs+ScSg2: 'i-noki-vini  #   "you see" (Sg)
noki+V+Prs+ScSg3M: bi-noki-vini  #   "he sees"
noki+V+Prs+ScSg3F: bi-noki-vini  #   "she sees"
noki+V+Prs+ScPl1: 'a-noki-vini  #   "we see"
noki+V+Prs+ScPl2: 'ava-noki-vini  #   "you see" (Pl)
noki+V+Prs+ScPl3M: va-noki-vini  #  "they see" (M)
noki+V+Prs+ScPl3F: va-noki-vini  #   "they see" (F)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-pad/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc)</small>
